North Dakota, session 69, HB1517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
North Dakota student teacher scholarship program.
1. The state board of higher education shall:
a. Develop and administer the North Dakota student teacher scholarship program to
provide scholarships for student teachers who will seek initial teacher licensure
after graduation;
b. Distribute funds for the scholarships to each institution or program with a physica l
presence in the state offering a North Dakota state-approved teacher preparation
program; and
c. Provide guidance and assistance to each North Dakota state-approved educator
preparation program to administer the program.
2. To be eligible to receive a scholarship under this section, a student must:
a. Be enrolled in a North Dakota state-approved teacher preparation program and
be completing the student teaching experience in the state;
b. Be progressing satisfactorily through the teacher preparation program, as
determined by the North Dakota state-approved educator preparation program ;
and
Page No. 1 25.1164.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Not hold an initial teaching license or an alternate access teaching license issued
by the North Dakota education standards and practices board.
3. An institution of higher education shall apply a scholarship not exceeding three
thousand dollars to an eligible student's tuition and fees for the semester the student is
completing the student teaching experience.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF HIGHER EDUCATION - STUDENT
TEACHER SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $4,200,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the state board of higher education for the purpose of
providing funds to institutions of higher education to award scholarships to students who are
eligible to receive a student teacher scholarship, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.1164.02000